Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.120

Right to strike not granted.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall permit or grant any public employee the right to strike or refuse to perform his or her official duties.

[ 2012 c 117 s 85; 1967 ex.s. c 108 s 12.]